Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.143

Relief from duty to register for sex offense or kidnapping offense committed when offender was a juvenile and who has not been determined to be a sexually violent predator—Petition—Exception.

(1) An offender having a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 for a sex offense or kidnapping offense committed when the offender was a juvenile, and who has not been determined to be a sexually violent predator pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW may petition the superior court to be relieved of that duty as provided in this section.

(2) For class A sex offenses or kidnapping offenses committed when the petitioner was fifteen years of age or older, the court may relieve the petitioner of the duty to register if:

(a) At least sixty months have passed since the petitioner's adjudication and completion of any term of confinement for the offense giving rise to the duty to register and the petitioner has not been adjudicated or convicted of any additional sex offenses or kidnapping offenses within the sixty months before the petition;

(b) The petitioner has not been adjudicated or convicted of a violation of RCW 9A.44.132 (failure to register) during the sixty months prior to filing the petition; and

(c) The petitioner shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the petitioner is sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant removal from the central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders.

(3) For all other sex offenses or kidnapping offenses committed by a juvenile not included in subsection (2) of this section, the court may relieve the petitioner of the duty to register if:

(a) At least twenty-four months have passed since the petitioner's adjudication and completion of any term of confinement for the offense giving rise to the duty to register and the petitioner has not been adjudicated or convicted of any additional sex offenses or kidnapping offenses within the twenty-four months before the petition;

(b) The petitioner has not been adjudicated or convicted of a violation of RCW 9A.44.132 (failure to register) during the twenty-four months prior to filing the petition; and

(c) The petitioner shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the petitioner is sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant removal from the central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders.

(4) A petition for relief from registration under this section shall be made to the court in which the petitioner was convicted of the offense that subjects him or her to the duty to register or, in the case of convictions in other states, a foreign country, or a federal or military court, to the court in the county in which the juvenile is registered at the time a petition is sought. The prosecuting attorney of the county shall be named and served as the respondent in any such petition. The prosecuting attorney must make reasonable efforts to notify the victim via the victim's choice of telephone, letter, or email, if known.

(5) In determining whether the petitioner is sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant removal from the central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders, the following factors are provided as guidance to assist the court in making its determination, to the extent the factors are applicable considering the age and circumstances of the petitioner:

(a) The nature of the registrable offense committed including the number of victims and the length of the offense history;

(b) Any subsequent criminal history;

(c) The petitioner's compliance with supervision requirements;

(d) The length of time since the charged incident(s) occurred;

(e) Any input from community corrections officers, juvenile parole or probation officers, law enforcement, or treatment providers;

(f) Participation in sex offender treatment;

(g) Participation in other treatment and rehabilitative programs;

(h) The offender's stability in employment and housing;

(i) The offender's community and personal support system;

(j) Any risk assessments or evaluations prepared by a qualified professional;

(k) Any updated polygraph examination;

(l) Any input of the victim;

(m) Any other factors the court may consider relevant.

(6) If a person is relieved of the duty to register pursuant to this section, the relief of registration does not constitute a certificate of rehabilitation, or the equivalent of a certificate of rehabilitation, for the purposes of restoration of firearm possession under RCW 9.41.040.

(7) A juvenile prosecuted and convicted of a sex offense or kidnapping offense as an adult pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 or 13.04.030 may not petition to the superior court under this section and must follow the provisions of RCW 9A.44.142.

(8) An adult prosecuted for an offense committed as a juvenile once the juvenile court has lost jurisdiction due to the passage of time between the date of the offense and the date of filing of charges may petition the superior court under the provisions of this section.

[ 2017 c 86 s 2; 2015 c 261 s 9; 2011 c 338 s 1; 2010 c 267 s 7.]

NOTES:

Application—2010 c 267: See note following RCW 9A.44.128.